Mississippi, session 2026, HB4100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Board of Supervisors of DeSoto County, Mississippi, is authorized, in its power, to expend, out of any available funds of the county, for the purchase of radar speed detection equipment.  Such expenditure may be in an amount that the board determines is sufficient, and such purchase shall be for use by the sheriff's department.  If the board of supervisors authorizes the expenditure of funds for this purpose, then the Sheriff of DeSoto County and any duly sworn deputy sheriff of the county may operate and use the equipment to enforce the motor vehicle speed limits on any public county road or state highway, which is located outside the corporate limits of any incorporated municipality. (2)  Any funds received in association with the issuance of a citation resulting from a speeding violation detected by a sheriff or deputy sheriff through the use of radar speed detection equipment shall be used to fund school resource officers in the various public schools of the county. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.